Maine, session 132, LD1713.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §1730-A is enacted to read:
§1730-A. Health care provider contract requirements
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "All-or-nothing clause" means a provision in a contract that:
(1) Requires a carrier to include all members of a provider in a network plan;
(2) Requires a carrier to enter into any additional contract with any or all affiliates
of a provider as a condition of entering into a contract with that provider; or
(3) Requires a carrier to agree to payment rates or other terms for an affiliate or
individual facility that is not party to the contract.
B. "Anti-steering clause" means a provision in a contract that restricts the ability of a
carrier to direct or steer an enrollee to obtain a health care service from another
provider, including offering incentives to encourage enrollees to use specific providers.
C. "Anti-tiering clause" means a provision in a contract that:
(1) Restricts the ability of a carrier to introduce or modify a tiered network plan or
assign providers into tiers;
(2) Requires a carrier or health plan administrator to place all members of a
provider in the same tier of a tiered network plan; or
(3) Restricts the ability of a carrier to introduce or assign providers to a particular
network.
D. "Carrier" has the same meaning as in Title 24-A, section 4301-A, subsection 3.
E. "Enrollee" has the same meaning as in Title 24-A, section 4301-A, subsection 5.
F. "Health plan" has the same meaning as in Title 24-A, section 4301-A, subsection 7.
G. "Provider" has the same meaning as in Title 24-A, section 4301-A, subsection 16.
2. Contract requirements. Beginning January 1, 2026, a provider, or a person acting
on the provider's behalf, may not offer, solicit, request, amend, renew or enter into a
contract with a carrier that would directly or indirectly include any of the following
provisions:
A. An anti-steering clause;
B. An anti-tiering clause; or
C. An all-or-nothing clause.
3. Unenforceable. A person may not enforce any contract provision, written policy,
written procedure or agreement contrary to the provisions set forth in this section.
4. Enforcement. The following provisions apply to enforcement of this section.
A. A carrier may institute a civil action against a provider to enforce the provisions of
subsection 2, including specific performance, injunctive or declaratory relief, and any
other relief the court considers appropriate.
Page 1 - 132LR2102(01)

B. The Attorney General may:
(1) Subpoena any records necessary to enforce this section or to investigate
suspected violations of this section; and
(2) Institute proceedings on behalf of the State or as parens patriae of the persons
residing in this State for:
(a) Injunctive relief to prevent and restrain a violation of this section,
including, but not limited to, a temporary restraining order, preliminary
injunction or permanent injunction;
(b) Civil penalties for violations of this section not to exceed $100,000 per
violation; or
(c) Other equitable relief for violations of this section.
Sec. 2. 24-A MRSA §4308-A is enacted to read:
§4308-A. Health care provider contract requirements
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "All-or-nothing clause" means a provision in a contract that:
(1) Requires a carrier to include all members of a provider in a network plan;
(2) Requires a carrier to enter into any additional contract with any or all affiliates
of a provider as a condition of entering into a contract with that provider; or
(3) Requires a carrier to agree to payment rates or other terms for an affiliate or
individual facility that is not party to the contract.
B. "Anti-steering clause" means a provision in a contract that restricts the ability of a
carrier to direct or steer an enrollee to obtain a health care service from another
provider, including offering incentives to encourage enrollees to use specific providers.
C. "Anti-tiering clause" means a provision in a contract that:
(1) Restricts the ability of a carrier to introduce or modify a tiered network plan or
assign providers into tiers;
(2) Requires a carrier to place all members of a provider in the same tier of a tiered
network plan; or
(3) Restricts the ability of a carrier to introduce or assign providers to a particular
network.
2. Contract requirements. Beginning January 1, 2026, a carrier, or a person acting
on the carrier's behalf, may not offer, solicit, request, amend, renew or enter into a contract
with a provider that would directly or indirectly include any of the following provisions:
A. An anti-steering clause;
B. An anti-tiering clause; or
C. An all-or-nothing clause.
3. Unenforceable. A person may not enforce any contract provision, written policy,
written procedure or agreement contrary to the provisions set forth in this section.
Page 2 - 132LR2102(01)

4. Enforcement. A carrier may institute a civil action to enforce the provisions of this
section, including specific performance, injunctive or declaratory relief, and any other
relief the court considers appropriate.